Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-1420.03
Gifts and services, acceptance.

The council may accept gifts, donations, money, and services, including in-kind resources, for any purpose allowable under the Light-Density Rail Line Assistance Act.

Laws 1991, LB 783, § 26;

Laws 1996, LB 463, § 29.